Utah statutes.
26-15-9.   Impoundment of adulterated food products authorized.

The department and local health departments may impound any food products found in places where food or drink is handled, sold, or served to the public that is intended for but found to be adulterated and unfit for human consumption; and, upon five days notice and reasonable opportunity for a hearing to the interested parties, to condemn and destroy the same if deemed necessary for the protection of the public health.



Enacted by Chapter 126, 1981 General Session

